Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.030

Workers' compensation act not affected.

RCW 4.20.005, 4.20.010, and 4.20.020 shall not repeal or supersede chapter 74 of the Laws of 1911 [Title 51 RCW] and acts amendatory thereof, or any part thereof.

[ 1917 c 123 s 5; RRS s 183-3.]